District of Columbia statutes.
16-523

Claims to attached property.

Any person may file his motion and affidavit in the cause, at any time before the final disposition of the property attached or its proceeds, except where it is real property, setting forth a claim thereto or an interest in or lien upon the same, acquired before the levy of the attachment. The court, without other pleading, shall try the issues raised by the claim, with a jury if either party so requests, and make all orders necessary to protect any rights of the claimant.

History

Dec. 23, 1963, 77 Stat. 550, Pub. L. 88-241, § 1

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 16-523.
1973 Ed., § 16-523.